Maryland, session 2025, HB1153.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
7–309.
(a) Notwithstanding an Act of Congress that repeals or reduces the federal credit
under § 2011 of the Internal Revenue Code, the provisions of this subtitle in effect before
the passage of the Act of Congress shall apply with respect to a decedent who dies after the
effective date of the Act of Congress so as to continue the Maryland estate tax in force
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1153*

HOUSE BILL 1153
without reduction in the same manner as if the federal credit had not been repealed or
reduced.
(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraphs (2) through (9) of this subsection and
subsection (c) of this section, after the effective date of an Act of Congress described in
subsection (a) of this section, the Maryland estate tax shall be determined using:
(i) the federal credit allowable by § 2011 of the Internal Revenue
Code as in effect before the reduction or repeal of the federal credit pursuant to the Act of
Congress; and
(ii) other provisions of federal estate tax law, INCLUDING THE
APPLICABLE UNIFIED CREDIT ALLOWED AGAINST THE FEDERAL ESTATE TAX, as in
effect on the date of the decedent’s death.
(2) Except as provided in paragraphs (3) through (9) of this subsection and
subsection (c) of this section, if the federal estate tax is not in effect on the date of the
decedent’s death, the Maryland estate tax shall be determined using:
(i) the federal credit allowable by § 2011 of the Internal Revenue
Code as in effect before the reduction or repeal of the federal credit pursuant to the Act of
Congress; and
(ii) other provisions of federal estate tax law, INCLUDING THE
APPLICABLE UNIFIED CREDIT ALLOWED AGAINST THE FEDERAL ESTATE TAX, as in
effect on the date immediately preceding the effective date of the repeal of the federal estate
tax.
(3) (i) Notwithstanding any increase in the unified credit allowed
against the federal estate tax for decedents dying after 2003, the unified credit used for
determining the Maryland estate tax for a decedent DYING BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2026,
may not exceed the applicable credit amount corresponding to an applicable exclusion
amount, within the meaning of § 2010(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, of:
1. $1,000,000 for a decedent dying before January 1, 2015;
2. $1,500,000 for a decedent dying on or after January 1,
2015, but before January 1, 2016;
3. $2,000,000 for a decedent dying on or after January 1,
2016, but before January 1, 2017;
4. $3,000,000 for a decedent dying on or after January 1,
2017, but before January 1, 2018;
5. $4,000,000 for a decedent dying on or after January 1,
2018, but before January 1, 2019; and

HOUSE BILL 1153 3
6. $5,000,000 for a decedent dying on or after January 1,
2019, BUT BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2026, plus any deceased spousal unused exclusion
amount calculated in accordance with paragraph (9) of this subsection.
(ii) The Maryland estate tax shall be determined without regard to
any deduction for State death taxes allowed under § 2058 of the Internal Revenue Code.
(iii) Unless the federal credit allowable by § 2011 of the Internal
Revenue Code is in effect on the date of the decedent’s death, the federal credit used to
determine the Maryland estate tax may not exceed 16% of the amount by which the
decedent’s taxable estate, as defined in § 2051 of the Internal Revenue Code, exceeds:
1. $1,000,000 for a decedent dying before January 1, 2015;
2. $1,500,000 for a decedent dying on or after January 1,
2015, but before January 1, 2016;
3. $2,000,000 for a decedent dying on or after January 1,
2016, but before January 1, 2017;
4. $3,000,000 for a decedent dying on or after January 1,
2017, but before January 1, 2018;
5. $4,000,000 for a decedent dying on or after January 1,
2018, but before January 1, 2019; [and]
6. $5,000,000 for a decedent dying on or after January 1,
2019, BUT BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2026, plus any deceased spousal unused exclusion
amount calculated in accordance with paragraph (9) of this subsection; AND
7. THE APPLICABLE EXCLUSION AMOUNT
CORRESPONDING TO THE APPLICABLE UNIFIED CREDIT UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OR
(2) OF THIS SUBSECTION FOR A DECEDENT DYING ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2026.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.